Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1954XS (4) 91 jda/jh S.F. 91 Section 1. Section 257.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Actual enrollment is determined annually by calculating the 4 average of the sum of all of the following on October 1, or the 5 first Monday in October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or 6 Sunday, and includes all of the following and the sum of all 7 of the following on March 1 immediately succeeding the October 8 determination, or the succeeding Monday if March 1 falls on a 9 Saturday or Sunday : 10 Sec. 2. Section 257.6, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 3. Additional enrollment because of special education. 13 a. A school district shall determine its additional 14 enrollment because of special education, as defined in this 15 section , by November October 1 of each year , or by the first 16 Monday in October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday, 17 and shall certify its additional enrollment because of special 18 education to the department of education by November October 15 19 of each year, or by the succeeding Monday if October 15 falls 20 on a Saturday or Sunday, and the department shall promptly 21 forward the information to the department of management. 22 b. For the purposes of this chapter , âadditional enrollment 23 because of special educationâ is determined by calculating the 24 average of the following: 25 (1) An amount determined by multiplying the weighting of 26 each category of child under section 256B.9 times the number of 27 children in each category totaled for all categories minus the 28 total number of children in all categories , as determined on 29 March 1 immediately succeeding the October determination under 30 subparagraph (2), or the succeeding Monday if March 1 falls on 31 a Saturday or Sunday . 32 (2) An amount determined by multiplying the weighting of 33 each category of child under section 256B.9 times the number 34 of children in each category totaled for all categories minus 35 -1- LSB 1954XS (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 91 the total number of children in all categories, as determined 1 on October 1 of each year, or the first Monday in October if 2 October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 3 Sec. 3. Section 257.6, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 2025, 4 is amended to read as follows: 5 a. Weighted enrollment is the budget enrollment plus 6 the districtâs additional enrollment because of special 7 education calculated by November 1 in October of the base year 8 under subsection 3 plus additional pupils added due to the 9 application of the supplementary weighting as determined under 10 subsection 5A . 11 Sec. 4. Section 257.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. Pupils added due to application of 14 supplementary weighting. 15 a. A school district shall determine its pupils added due 16 to application of supplementary weighting by October 1 of each 17 year, or by the first Monday in October if October 1 falls on a 18 Saturday or Sunday, and shall certify its pupils added due to 19 the application of supplementary weighting to the department 20 of education by October 15 of each year, or by the succeeding 21 Monday if October 15 falls on a Saturday or Sunday, and the 22 department shall promptly forward the information to the 23 department of management. 24 b. For the purposes of this chapter, âpupils added due 25 to application of supplementary weightingâ is determined by 26 calculating the average of the following: 27 (1) The sum of the number of additional pupils assigned to 28 a student or to the school district under section 257.11 or 29 280.4, or other provision of law providing for supplementary 30 weighting, but excluding those under subsection 1, as 31 determined on March 1 immediately succeeding the October 32 determination under subparagraph (2), or the succeeding Monday 33 if March 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 34 (2) The sum of the number of additional pupils assigned to 35 -2- LSB 1954XS (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 91 a student or to the school district under section 257.11 or 1 280.4, or other provision of law providing for supplementary 2 weighting, but excluding those under subsection 1, as 3 determined on October 1 of each year, or the first Monday in 4 October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday. 5 Sec. 5. Section 261E.7, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 6 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 Not later than June 30 of each year, a school district 8 shall pay a tuition reimbursement amount to a postsecondary 9 institution that has enrolled its resident eligible 10 students under this chapter , unless the eligible student is 11 participating in open enrollment under section 282.18 , in 12 which case, the tuition reimbursement amount shall be paid 13 by the receiving district. However, if a childâs residency 14 changes during a school year, the tuition shall be paid by the 15 district in which the child was enrolled as of the October 16 date specified in section 257.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , 17 or the district in which the child was counted under section 18 257.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) , as of 19 the October date specified in section 257.6, subsection 1, 20 paragraph âaâ . For students enrolled at the Iowa school for 21 the deaf, the department of education shall pay a tuition 22 reimbursement amount by June 30 of each year. The amount of 23 tuition reimbursement for each separate course shall equal the 24 lesser of: 25 Sec. 6. Section 273.5, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 5. Provide Annually provide each school district within 28 the area served and the department of education with a special 29 education weighted enrollment count, including the additional 30 enrollment because of special education for December 1 of each 31 year . 32 Sec. 7. Section 279.60, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 1. Each school district shall administer the teaching 35 -3- LSB 1954XS (4) 91 jda/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 91 strategies gold early childhood assessment to every resident 1 prekindergarten or four-year-old child whose parent or guardian 2 enrolls the child in the district, and shall administer a valid 3 and reliable universal screening instrument, as prescribed by 4 the department of education, to every kindergarten student 5 enrolled in the district not later than the October date 6 specified in section 257.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ . The 7 assessment shall be aligned with state early learning standards 8 and preschool programs shall be encouraged to administer the 9 assessment at least at the beginning and end of the preschool 10 program, with the assessment information entered into the 11 statewide longitudinal data system. The department shall work 12 to develop agreements with head start programs to incorporate 13 similar information about four-year-old children served by head 14 start into the statewide longitudinal data system. 15 Sec. 8. Section 282.12, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 4. The number of pupils participating in a whole grade 18 sharing agreement shall be determined on the October date 19 specified in section 257.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , and on 20 the second Friday of January of each year. 21 Sec. 9. Section 282.18, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 a. If a parent or guardian of a child, who is participating 24 in open enrollment under this section , moves to a different 25 school district during the course of either districtâs academic 26 year, the childâs first district of residence as determined 27 on the October date specified in section 257.6, subsection 1 , 28 paragraph âaâ , shall be responsible for payment of the cost 29 per pupil plus weightings or special education costs to the 30 receiving school district for the balance of the school year in 31 which the move took place. The new district of residence shall 32 be responsible for the payments during succeeding years. 33 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 34 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 35 -4- LSB 1954XS (4) 91 jda/jh 4/ 5 S.F. 91 Sec. 11. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to actual 1 enrollment determinations for school budget years beginning on 2 or after the effective date of this Act. 3